Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2404
Sanitary sewer extension mains; water extension mains; assessments; maturity; interest; rate.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the assessment of special taxes for sanitary sewer extension mains or water extension mains in a district shall be levied at one time and shall become delinquent in equal annual installments over a period of years equal to the number of years for which the bonds for such project were issued pursuant to section 19-2405. The first installment becomes delinquent fifty days after the making of such levy. Subsequent installments become delinquent on the anniversary date of the levy. Each installment, except the first, shall draw interest at the rate set by the city council or board of trustees from the time of such levy until such installment becomes delinquent. After an installment becomes delinquent, interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, shall be paid thereon until such installment is collected and paid. Such special taxes shall be collected and enforced as in the case of general municipal taxes and shall be a lien on such real estate from and after the date of the levy. If three or more of such installments become delinquent and unpaid on the same property, the city council or the board of trustees may by resolution declare all future installments on such delinquent property to be due on a future fixed date. The resolution shall set forth the description of the property and the name of its record title owner and shall provide that all future installments shall become delinquent upon the date fixed. A copy of such resolution shall be published one time in a legal newspaper of general circulation published in the municipality or, if none is published in such municipality, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. After the fixed date such future installments shall be deemed to be delinquent and the municipality may proceed to enforce and collect the total amount due including all future installments.

(2) If the city or village incurs no new indebtedness pursuant to section 19-2405 for any water service extension or sanitary sewer extension in a district, the assessment of special taxes for such improvements shall be levied at one time and shall become delinquent in equal annual installments over such period of years as the city council or board of trustees determines at the time of making the levy to be reasonable and fair.

Laws 1961, c. 63, § 3, p. 249;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 76, p. 322;

Laws 1980, LB 655, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 933, § 23;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 24;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 161, § 9.